District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-524

Delay by filing office.

Delay by the filing office beyond a time limit prescribed by this part is excused if:

(1)

The delay is caused by interruption of communication or computer facilities, war, emergency conditions, failure of equipment, or other circumstances beyond control of the filing office; and

(2)

The filing office exercises reasonable diligence under the circumstances.

History

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-201, § 101, 47 DCR 7576

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Source. New; derived from Section 4-109.